California statutes. Insurance Code
 the right to cancel this policy within five days of receiving this disclosure. If you cancel coverage, the premium will be prorated and any broker’s fee charged for this insurance will be returned to you.”
(c) When a contract is issued to an industrial insured, neither the nonadmitted insurer nor the surplus line broker is required to provide the notice required in this section except on the confirmation of insurance, the certificate of placement, or the policy, whichever is first provided to the insured, nor is the insurer or surplus line broker required to obtain the insured’s signature. The producer shall ensure that the notice affixed to the confirmation of insurance, certificate of placement, or the policy is provided to the insured. The producer shall insert the current toll-free telephone number of the Department of Insurance as provided in paragraph 4 of the notice.

(1) An industrial insured is an insured that does both of the following:

(A) Employs at least 25 employees on average during the prior 12 months.

(B) Has aggregate annual premiums for insurance for all risks other than workers’ compensation and health coverage totaling no less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or obtains insurance through the services of a full-time employee acting as an insurance manager or a continuously retained insurance consultant. A “continuously retained insurance consultant” does not include: (i) an agent or broker through whom the insurance is being placed, (ii) a subagent or subproducer involved in the transaction, or (iii) an agent or broker that is a business organization employing or contracting with a person mentioned in clauses (i) and (ii).

(2) The surplus line broker shall be responsible for ensuring that the applicant is an industrial insured. A surplus line broker who reasonably relies on information provided in good faith by the applicant, whether directly or through the producer, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this requirement.

(d) For purposes of compliance with the requirement of subdivision (a) that the signature of the applicant be obtained, the following shall apply:

(1) If the insurance transaction is not conducted at an in-person, face-to-face meeting, the applicant’s signature on the disclosure form may be transmitted by the applicant to the agent or broker via facsimile or comparable electronic transmittal.

(2) In the case of commercial lines coverage, or personal
 insurance coverage subject to Section 675 and any umbrella coverage associated therewith, where an applicant requires that insurance coverage be bound immediately, either because existing coverage will lapse within two business days of the time the insurance is bound or because the applicant is required to have coverage in place within two business days, and the applicant cannot meet in person with the agent or broker to sign the disclosure form, the agent or broker may obtain the signature of the applicant within five days of binding coverage, provided that the applicant may cancel the insurance so placed within five days of receiving the disclosure form from the agent or broker. The cancellation shall be on a pro rata basis, and the applicant shall be entitled to the rescission or return of any broker’s fees charged for the placement. When a policy is canceled, the broker shall inform the applicant that the broker’s fee must be returned and that the premium must be prorated.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not apply to insurance issued or delivered in this state by a nonadmitted Mexican insurer by and through a surplus line broker affording coverage exclusively in the Republic of Mexico on property located temporarily or permanently in, or operations conducted temporarily or permanently within, the Republic of Mexico.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 201, Sec. 9.   (AB 1813)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.2.

No surplus line broker shall issue any evidence of insurance or cause or purport to cause any risk to be insured by a nonadmitted insurer or advise any home state insured or home state insured applicant for insurance that coverage has been or will be obtained from a nonadmitted insurer unless:

(a) The broker has prior written authority from the nonadmitted insurer to cause the risk to be insured;

(b) The broker has received advice in the ordinary course of business that the coverage has been obtained; or

(c) A policy of insurance covering the insured for the risk has actually
 been issued by the nonadmitted insurer and delivered to the insured or his or her representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 18.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.3.

If the surplus line broker acts in reliance on advice received in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1764.2, the broker shall deliver the policy to the home state insured or his or her representative, and, if the delivery is not made within 30 days after the date of the issuance of the certificate or upon which the risk has been bound or the home state insured or the home state insured applicant has been advised that coverage has been or will be obtained, he or she shall deliver to the insured either of the following:

(a) A photostatic copy of evidence that the insurance has been bound.

(b) If the nonadmitted insurer is located
 outside the United States, a cover note, placing slip, or similar document evidencing coverage issued or certified to by any broker located outside the United States who actually placed that insurance with the nonadmitted insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 19.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.4.

The prior written authority, policy of insurance or copy of evidence that insurance has been bound referred to in Section 1764.2, shall contain authentication by all persons assuming any risk of loss, and, if there is more than one such person, both it and any document issued or certified by the placing broker pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1764.3 , shall contain a specification of whether their obligation is joint or several, and if the latter, the proportion of the obligation assumed by each person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.5.

If insurance results from a transaction in which any provision of Sections 1764.2 to 1764.4 is violated, such insurance is subject to cancellation by the insured or by order of the commissioner. Such cancellation shall be without penalty to the insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 467.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.7.

Any person who willfully violates Section 1760.5, 1761, 1763, 1764, 1764.1, 1764.2, 1764.3, 1764.4, 1765.1, 1765.2, 1767, or 1780 is guilty of a public offense and punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not exceeding one year or by fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 210.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.

(a) A license under this chapter shall be applied for and renewed by the filing with the commissioner of a written application therefor, in accordance with Section 1652.

(b) Subject to subdivision (f), the commissioner shall issue a license authorizing any applicant who is trustworthy and competent to transact an insurance brokerage business in a manner as to safeguard the interest of the insured, to act as a surplus line broker from the date of the license until the expiration date specified in Section 1630.

(c) An applicant for a surplus line broker’s license shall, as part of the application and a condition of the issuance of the license, file a bond to the people of the State of California in the
 sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), conditioned that the licensee will fully and faithfully comply with the requirements of this chapter, and all applicable provisions of this code. The bond shall be subject to Sections 1662 and 1663. A surplus line broker bond is not required for an individual licensed as a surplus line broker who transacts only on behalf of a licensed surplus line broker organization.

(d) Every applicant for a business entity license, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1765.2, shall provide the names of all persons who may exercise the power and perform the duties under the license. Whenever an organization licensed as a surplus line broker desires to change, remove, or add to the natural person or persons who are to transact insurance under authority of its license, it shall immediately file an application or notice with the commissioner for an endorsement changing its license accordingly, on a form prescribed by
 the commissioner. The fee for adding or removing from any surplus line broker’s license issued to an organization the name of any natural person, named thereon, shall be twenty-nine dollars ($29). The commissioner shall require that the qualifying examination provided by subdivision (a) of Section 1676 be taken by any natural person named by the organization to exercise its agency or brokerage powers who would be required to take and pass the qualifying examination. That natural person or persons and the organization are in all other respects subject to the provisions of this chapter and the insurance laws.

(e) The department is authorized to collect additional license fees resulting from the increases in license fees provided by Chapter 29 of the Statutes of 2008 and shall credit any overpayment resulting from reductions in license fees provided by that act.

(f) A business entity
 licensed under this chapter shall provide two hours of appropriate training to its employees who solicit, negotiate, or effect insurance coverage placed by a nonadmitted insurer. The training shall be given to each eligible employee every five years. The surplus line advisory organization authorized pursuant to Chapter 6.1 (commencing with Section 1780.50) shall develop the curriculum for the training.

(g) The license shall be renewed in accordance with, and subject to, Sections 1717, 1718, 1719, and 1720.

(h) The commissioner may deny, suspend, or revoke any license applied for or granted pursuant to this chapter on all or any one of the grounds and in accordance with the procedures provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 1666) and Article 13 (commencing with Section 1737) of Chapter 5, whenever the commissioner finds that the applicant or licensee has committed a
 violation of any provision of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 46.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.1.

No surplus line broker shall place any coverage with a nonadmitted insurer for a home state insured unless the insurer is domiciled in the Republic of Mexico and the placement covers only liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, aircraft, or boat in the Republic of Mexico, or, at the time of placement, the nonadmitted insurer meets the requirements of either subdivision (a) or (b):

(a) If the insurer is domiciled in one of the states of the United States or its territories as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 1760.1:

(1) Is licensed to write the type of insurance in its domiciliary jurisdiction; and

(2) (A) Has capital and surplus that together total forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000).

(B) The requirements of subparagraph (A) may be satisfied by an insurer possessing less than forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) upon an affirmative finding of acceptability by the commissioner. The finding shall be based upon factors such as quality of management, capital and surplus of any parent company, company underwriting profit and investment income trends, market availability, and company record and reputation within the industry. The commissioner is prohibited from making an affirmative finding of acceptability when the foreign insurer’s capital and surplus is less than four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000); or

(C) If a foreign insurer that was listed as an eligible surplus
 line insurer as of January 1, 2011, and did not have the forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) of capital and surplus as of January 1, 2011, that insurer shall have at least thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of capital and surplus as of December 31, 2011, and at least forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) of capital and surplus as of December 31, 2013.

(b) If the insurer is not domiciled in one of the states of the United States or its territories as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 1760.1, the insurer is listed on the Quarterly Listing of Alien Insurers maintained by the NAIC International Insurers Department (IID) and is licensed as an insurer in its domiciliary jurisdiction.

(c) If at any time the commissioner determines that an insurer is no longer eligible pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the commissioner may issue an order without prior notice and hearing.
 At the time an order is issued pursuant to this subdivision to an insurer, the commissioner shall notify all surplus line brokers of the order.

(d) The commissioner may require, at least annually, the submission of records and statements as are reasonably necessary to ensure that the requirements of this section are maintained.

(e) The commissioner shall establish by regulation a schedule of fees to cover costs of administering and enforcing this chapter.

(f) (1) Insurance may be placed on a limited basis with insurers not eligible pursuant to this section if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The use of multiple insurers is necessary to obtain coverage for 100 percent of the risk.

(B) At least 80 percent of the risk is placed with admitted insurers or insurers that are eligible nonadmitted insurers.

(C) The placing surplus line broker submits to the commissioner, or his or her designee, copies of all documentation relied upon by the surplus line broker to make the broker’s determination that the financial stability, reputation, and integrity of the ineligible insurer or insurers, are adequate to safeguard the interest of the insured under the policy. This documentation, and any other documentation regarding the ineligible insurer requested by the commissioner, shall be submitted no more than 30 days after the insurance is placed with the unlisted insurer for the initial placement by that broker with the particular ineligible insurer, and annually thereafter for as long as the broker continues to make placements with the ineligible insurer pursuant to this
 paragraph.

(D) The insured has aggregate annual premiums for all risks other than workers’ compensation or health coverage totaling no less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(2) Insurance may not be placed pursuant to paragraph (1) if any of the following applies:

(A) The ineligible insurer has for any reason been objected to by the commissioner pursuant to this section or has become ineligible.

(B) The insurance includes coverage for employer-sponsored medical, surgical, hospital, or other health or medical expense benefits payable to the employee by the insurer.

(C) The insurance is mandatory under the laws of the federal government, this state, or any political subdivision
 thereof, and includes any portion of limits of coverage mandated by those laws.

(D) The insured is a multiple employer welfare arrangement, as defined in Section 1002(40)(A) of Title 29 of the United States Code, or any other arrangement among two or more employers that are not under common ownership or control, which is established or maintained for the primary purpose of providing insurance benefits to the employees of two or more employers.

(E) Ineligible insurers represent a disproportionate portion of the lower layers of the coverage.

(3) Nothing in this section is intended to alter any duties of a surplus line broker pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1765 or other laws of this state to safeguard the interests of the insured under the policy in recommending or placing insurance with a nonadmitted
 insurer.

(4) Placements authorized by this subdivision are intended to provide sophisticated insurance purchasers with a means to obtain necessary commercial insurance coverage from nonadmitted insurers that are not eligible in situations where it is not commercially possible to fully obtain that coverage from either admitted or eligible insurers. This subdivision shall not be deemed to permit surplus line brokers to place with nonadmitted insurers common commercial or personal line coverages for insureds that can be placed with insurers that are admitted or eligible pursuant to this section, whether the insured is an individual insured, or a group created primarily for the purpose of purchasing insurance.

(g) With respect to a nonadmitted insurer that is listed as an eligible surplus line insurer as of July 21, 2011, pursuant to the former Section 1765.1 as it read prior to July
 21, 2011, this section shall not be effective until the subsequent expiration of the policies of that insurer in effect on July 21, 2011. Nothing in the bill that amended this section during the 2011 portion of the 2011–12 Regular Session is intended to repeal or imply there is not authority to adopt, or to have adopted, or to continue in force, any regulation, or part thereof, with respect to surplus line insurance, which is not clearly inconsistent with it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 35.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.2.

A surplus line broker may place any coverage with a California-approved nonadmitted insurer if the insurer is domiciled in the Republic of Mexico and the placement covers only liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, aircraft, or boat in the Republic of Mexico, or if, at the time of placement, the nonadmitted insurer meets the following requirements:

(a) (1) Has established its financial stability, reputation, and integrity, for the class of insurance the broker proposes to place, by satisfactory evidence submitted to the commissioner through a surplus line broker.

(2) Meets one of the following requirements with respect to its financial stability:

(A) Has capital and surplus that together total at least forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000). “Capital” shall be as defined in Section 36. “Surplus” shall be defined as assets exceeding the sum of liabilities for losses reported, expenses, taxes, and all other indebtedness and reinsurance of outstanding risks as provided by law and paid-in capital in the case of an insurer issuing or having outstanding shares of capital stock. The type of assets to be used in calculating capital and surplus shall be as follows: at least twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be in the form of cash, or securities of the same character and quality as specified in Sections 1170 to 1182, inclusive, or in readily marketable securities listed on regulated United States’ national or principal regional securities exchanges. The remaining assets shall be in the form just described or in the form of investments of substantially the same character and quality
 as described in Sections 1190 to 1202, inclusive. In calculating capital and surplus under this section, the term “same character and quality” shall permit, but not require, the commissioner to approve assets maintained in accordance with the laws of another state or country. The commissioner shall be guided by the limitations, restrictions, or other requirements of this code or the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual in determining whether assets substantially similar to those described in Sections 1190 to 1202, inclusive, qualify. The commissioner shall retain the discretion to disapprove or disallow an asset that is not of a sound quality, or that he or she deems to create an unacceptable risk of loss to the insurer or to policyholders. Letters of credit shall not qualify as assets in the calculation of surplus. If capital and surplus together total less than forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000), the commissioner has affirmatively found that the
 capital and surplus are adequate to protect California policyholders. The commissioner shall consider, on determining whether to make this finding, factors such as quality of management, the capital and surplus of a parent company, the underwriting profit and investment income trends, and the record of claims payment and claims handling practices of the nonadmitted insurer.

(B) In the case of an “Insurance Exchange” created and authorized under the laws of individual states, maintains capital and surplus of not less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in the aggregate. “Capital” shall be as defined in Section 36. “Surplus” shall be defined as assets exceeding the sum of liabilities for losses reported, expenses, taxes, and all other indebtedness and reinsurance of outstanding risks as provided by law and paid-in capital in the case of an insurer issuing or having outstanding shares of capital stock. The type of assets to be used in
 calculating capital and surplus shall be as follows: at least twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be in the form of cash, or securities of the same character and quality as specified in Sections 1170 to 1182, inclusive, or in readily marketable securities listed on regulated United States’ national or principal regional securities exchanges. The remaining assets shall be in the form just described or in the form of investments of substantially the same character and quality as described in Sections 1190 to 1202, inclusive. In calculating capital and surplus under this section, the term “same character and quality” shall permit, but not require, the commissioner to approve assets maintained in accordance with the laws of another state or country. The commissioner shall be guided by the limitations, restrictions, or other requirements of this code or the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual in determining whether assets substantially similar to
 those described in Sections 1190 to 1202, inclusive, qualify. The commissioner shall retain the discretion to disapprove or disallow an asset that is not of a sound quality, or that he or she deems to create an unacceptable risk of loss to the insurer or to policyholders. Letters of credit shall not qualify as assets in the calculation of surplus. Each individual syndicate seeking to accept surplus line placements of risks resident, located, or to be performed in this state shall maintain minimum capital and surplus of not less than six million four hundred thousand dollars ($6,400,000). Each individual syndicate shall increase the capital and surplus required by this paragraph by one million dollars ($1,000,000) each year until it attains a capital and surplus of forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000).

(C) In the case of a syndicate that is part of a group consisting of incorporated individual insurers, or a combination of both incorporated
 and unincorporated insurers, that at all times maintains a trust fund of not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in a qualified United States financial institution as security to the full amount thereof for the United States surplus line policyholders and beneficiaries of direct policies of the group, including all policyholders and beneficiaries of direct policies of the syndicate, and the full balance in the trust fund is available to satisfy the liabilities of each member of the group of those syndicates, incorporated individual insurers or other unincorporated insurers, without regard to their individual contributions to that trust fund, and the trust complies with the terms of and conditions specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the syndicate is excepted from the capital and surplus requirements of subparagraph (A). The incorporated members of the group shall not be engaged in any business other than underwriting as a member of the group and shall be subject to the same level
 of solvency regulation and control by the group’s domiciliary regulator as are the unincorporated members.

(b) (1) In addition, to be approved as a surplus line insurer, an insurer not domiciled in one of the United States or its territories shall have in force in the United States an irrevocable trust account in a qualified United States financial institution, for the protection of United States policyholders, of not less than five million four hundred thousand dollars ($5,400,000) and consisting of cash, securities acceptable to the commissioner that are authorized pursuant to Sections 1170 to 1182, inclusive, readily marketable securities acceptable to the commissioner that are listed on a regulated United States national or principal regional security exchange, or clean and irrevocable letters of credit acceptable to the commissioner and issued by a qualified United States financial institution. The trust agreement
 shall be in a form acceptable to the commissioner. The funds in the trust account may be included in any calculation of capital and surplus, except letters of credit, which shall not be included in the calculation.

(2) In the case of a syndicate seeking approval under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the syndicate shall, in addition to the requirements of that subparagraph, at a minimum, maintain in the United States a trust account in an amount satisfactory to the commissioner that is not less than the amount required by the domiciliary state of the syndicate’s trust. The trust account shall comply with the terms and conditions specified in paragraph (1).

(3) In the case of a group of incorporated insurers under common administration that maintains a trust fund of not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in a qualified United States financial
 institution for the payment of claims of its United States policyholders, their assigns, or successors in interest and that complies with the terms and conditions of paragraph (1) that has continuously transacted an insurance business outside the United States for at least three years, that is in good standing with its domiciliary regulator, whose individual insurer members maintain standards and a financial condition reasonably comparable to admitted insurers, that submits to this state’s authority to examine its books and bears the expense of examination, and that has an aggregate policyholder surplus of ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000), the group is excepted from the capital and surplus requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) Unless available from the NAIC or other public source, has caused to be provided to the commissioner the following documents:

(1) The financial
 documents as specified below, each showing the insurer’s condition as of a date not more than 12 months prior to submission:

(A) A copy of an annual statement, prepared in the form prescribed by the NAIC. For an alien insurer, in lieu of an annual statement, a licensee may submit a form as set forth by regulation and as prepared by the insurer, and, if listed by the IID, a copy of the complete information as required in the application for listing by the IID.

(B) A copy of an audited financial report on the insurer’s condition that meets the standards of subparagraph (D) for foreign insurers or subparagraph (E) for alien insurers.

(C) If the insurer is an alien:

(i) A certified copy of the trust agreement referenced in subdivision (b).

(ii) A verified copy of the most recent quarterly statement or list of the assets in the trust.

(D) Financial reports filed pursuant to this section by foreign insurers shall conform to the following standards:

(i) Financial documents shall be certified.

(ii) An audited financial report shall constitute a supplement to the insurer’s annual statement, as required by the annual statement instructions issued by the NAIC.

(iii) An audited financial report shall be prepared by an independent certified public accountant or accounting firm in good standing with the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and in all states where licensed to practice; and be prepared in conformity with
 statutory accounting practices prescribed, or otherwise permitted, by the insurance regulator of the insurer’s domiciliary jurisdiction.

(iv) An audited financial report shall include information on the insurer’s financial position as of the end of the most recent calendar year, and the results of its operations, cashflows, and changes in capital and surplus for the year then ended.

(v) An audited financial report shall be prepared in a form and using language and groupings substantially the same as the relevant sections of the insurer’s annual statement filed with its domiciliary jurisdiction, and presenting comparatively the amounts as of December 31 of the most recent calendar year and the amounts as of December 31 of the preceding year.

(E) Financial reports filed pursuant to this section by alien insurers shall
 conform to the following standards:

(i) Except as provided in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C), financial documents should be certified. If certification of a financial document is not available, the document shall be verified.

(ii) Financial documents should be expressed in United States dollars, but may be expressed in another currency, if the exchange rate for the other currency as of the date of the document is also provided.

(iii) The responses provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) on the form submitted in lieu of an annual statement should follow the most recent Insurance Solvency International Guide to Alien Reporting Format, “Standard Definitions of Accounting Items.” Responses that do not agree with a standard definition shall be fully explained in the form.

(iv) An audited financial report shall be prepared by an independent licensed auditor in the insurer’s domiciliary jurisdiction or in any state.

(v) An audited financial report shall be prepared in accord with either (I) Generally Accepted Auditing Standards that prescribe Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or (II) International Accounting Standards as published and revised from time to time by the International Auditing Guidelines published by the International Auditing Practice Committee of the International Federation of Accountants, and shall include financial statement notes and a summary of significant accounting practices.

(F) The commissioner may accept, in lieu of a document described above, a certified or verified financial or regulatory document, statement, or report if the commissioner finds that it
 possesses reliability and financial detail substantially equal to or greater than the document for which it is proposed to be a substitute.

(G) If one of the financial documents required to be submitted under subparagraphs (A) and (B) is dated within 12 months of submission, but the other document is not so dated, the licensee may use the outdated document if it is accompanied by a supplement. The supplement must meet the same requirements that apply to the supplemented document and must update the outdated document to a date within the prescribed time period, preferably to the same date as the nonsupplemented document.

(2) A certified copy of the insurer’s license issued by its domiciliary jurisdiction, plus a certification of good standing, certificate of compliance, or other equivalent certificate, from either that jurisdiction or, if the jurisdiction does not issue those
 certificates, from a state where it is licensed.

(3) Information on the insurer’s agent in California for service of process, including the agent’s full name and address. The agent’s address must include a street address where the agent can be reached during normal business hours.

(4) The complete street address, mailing address, and telephone number of the insurer’s principal place of business.

(5) A certified or verified explanation, report, or other statement from the insurance regulatory office or official of the insurer’s domiciliary jurisdiction concerning the insurer’s record regarding market conduct and consumer complaints, or, if that information cannot be obtained from that jurisdiction, then any other information that the licensee can procure to demonstrate a good reputation for payment of claims and
 treatment of policyholders.

(6) A verified statement, from the insurer or licensee, on whether the insurer or an affiliated entity is currently known to be the subject of an order or proceeding regarding conservation, liquidation, or other receivership; or regarding revocation or suspension of a license to transact insurance in any jurisdiction; or otherwise seeking to stop the insurer from transacting insurance in any jurisdiction. The statement shall identify the proceeding by date, jurisdiction, and relief or sanction sought, and shall attach a copy of the relevant order.

(7) A certified copy of the most recent report of examination or an explanation if the report is not available.

(8) A list of all California surplus line brokers authorized by the insurer to issue policies on its behalf, and any additions to or
 deletions from that list.

(d) (1) Has provided additional information or documentation required by the commissioner that is relevant to the financial stability, reputation, and integrity of the nonadmitted insurer. In making a determination concerning financial stability, reputation, and integrity of the nonadmitted insurer, the commissioner shall consider any analyses, findings, or conclusions made by the NAIC in its review of the insurer for purposes of inclusion on or exclusion from the list of authorized nonadmitted insurers maintained by the NAIC. The commissioner may, but shall not be required to, rely on, adopt, or otherwise accept any analyses, findings, or conclusions of the NAIC, as the commissioner deems appropriate. In the case of a syndicate seeking eligibility under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the commissioner may, but shall not be required to, rely on, adopt, or otherwise accept any
 analyses, findings, or conclusions of a state, as the commissioner deems appropriate, as long as that state, in its method of regulation and review, meets the requirements of paragraph (2).

(2) The regulatory body of the state shall regularly receive and review the following: (A) an audited financial statement of the syndicate, prepared by a certified or chartered public accountant; (B) an opinion of a qualified actuary with regard to the syndicate’s aggregate reserves for payment of losses or claims and payment of expenses of adjustment or settlement of losses or claims; (C) a certification from the qualified United States financial institution that acts as the syndicate’s trustee, respecting the existence and value of the syndicate’s trust fund; and (D) information concerning the syndicate’s or its manager’s operating history, business plan, ownership and control, experience, and ability, together with any other pertinent factors, and any
 information indicating that the syndicate or its manager make reasonably prompt payment of claims in this state or elsewhere. The regulatory body of the state shall have the authority, either by law or through the operation of a valid and enforceable agreement, to review the syndicate’s assets and liabilities and audit the syndicate’s trust account, and shall exercise that authority with a frequency and in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner.

(e) Has established that:

(1) All documents required by subdivisions (c) and (d) have been filed. Each of the documents appear after review to be complete, clear, comprehensible, unambiguous, accurate, and consistent.

(2) The documents affirm that the insurer is not subject in any jurisdiction to an order or proceeding that:

(A) Seeks to stop it from transacting insurance.

(B) Relates to conservation, liquidation, or other receivership.

(C) Relates to revocation or suspension of its license.

(3) The documents affirm that the insurer has actively transacted insurance for the three years immediately preceding the filing made under this section, unless an exemption is granted. As used in this paragraph, “insurer” does not include a syndicate of underwriting entities. The commissioner may grant an exemption if the licensee has applied for exemption and demonstrates either of the following:

(A) The insurer meets the condition for any exception set forth in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 716.

(B) If the insurer has been actively transacting insurance for at least 12 months, and the licensee demonstrates that the exemption is warranted because the insurer’s current financial strength, operating history, business plan, ownership and control, management experience, and ability, together with any other pertinent factors, make three years of active insurance transaction unnecessary to establish sufficient reputation.

(4) The documents confirm that the insurer holds a license to issue insurance policies, other than reinsurance, to residents of the jurisdiction that granted the license unless an exemption is granted. The commissioner may grant an exemption if the licensee has applied for an exemption and demonstrates that the exemption is warranted because the insurer proposes to issue in California only commercial coverage, and is wholly owned and actually controlled by
 substantial and knowledgeable business enterprises that are its policyholders and that effectively govern the insurer’s destiny in furtherance of their own business objectives.

(5) The information filed pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) or otherwise filed with or available to the commissioner, including reports received from California policyholders, shall indicate that the insurer makes reasonably prompt payment of claims in this state or elsewhere.

(6) The information available to the commissioner shall not indicate that the insurer offers in California a licensee products or rates that violate any provision of this code.

(f) Has been placed on the list of approved surplus line insurers by the commissioner. The commissioner shall establish a list of all surplus line insurers that have met the
 requirements of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, and shall publish a master list at least semiannually. An insurer receiving approval as an approved surplus line insurer shall be added by addendum to the list at the time of approval, and shall be incorporated into the master list at the next date of publication. If an insurer appears on the most recent list, it shall be presumed that the insurer is an approved surplus line insurer, unless the commissioner or his or her designee has mailed or causes to be mailed notice to all surplus line brokers that the commissioner has withdrawn the insurer’s approval. Upon receipt of notice, the surplus line broker shall no longer advertise that the insurer is approved. Nothing in this subdivision shall limit the commissioner’s discretion to withdraw an insurer’s approval.

(g) (1) Except as provided by paragraph (2), whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe, and